Maine, session 132, LD1268.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 23 MRSA §4408 is enacted to read:
§4408. Stipend for employees
Beginning January 1, 2026, the Department of Transportation shall provide an annual
stipend to all employees of the Maine State Ferry Service calculated for each employee at
an amount equal to $5.00 per hour multiplied by the total hours worked in the previous year
for that employee.
Sec. 2. Prohibition to increase ferry tolls. Notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, the implementation of this Act may not cause an increase in tolls under the
Maine Revised Statutes, Title 23, section 4404.